Washington statutes.
RCW 36.36.050

Dissolution of aquifer protection area—Petition—Ballot proposition.

A county legislative authority may dissolve an aquifer protection area upon a finding that such dissolution is in the public interest.

A ballot proposition to dissolve an aquifer protection district shall be placed on the ballot for the approval or rejection of the voters residing in an aquifer protection area, when a petition requesting such a ballot proposition is signed by at least twenty percent of the voters residing in the aquifer protection area and is filed with the county legislative authority of the county originally creating the aquifer protection area. The ballot proposition shall be placed on the ballot at the next general election occurring sixty or more days after the petition has been filed. Approval of the ballot proposition by a simple majority vote shall cause the dissolution of the aquifer protection area.

[ 1985 c 425 s 5.]